src/phonology/gle-phon.verbs.xfscript
! Verb (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! 
! (c) 2001 - NEW
! 2005 - new vn/va triggers
!***************************************************************************
!read regex
! PastInd & Imper use stem
regex [i g h -> [%^FT] || _ (%^Caol) %^igh ?* %^Verb [[\%^Fr]|.#.]] 
.o.
[%^igh ->[]]
.o.
[a i g h -> [%^FT] || _ %^aigh ?* %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[%^aigh ->[]]
.o.
!! Verbal Noun Gen
[á i l t e -> %^FT á l a || _ %^áil %^Verb ] 
.o.
[%^áil ->[]]
.o.
! Verbal Adjectives
[t h -> [%^FT] || _ %^th %^Verb ]
.o.
! th -> te 
[%^th ->[]]
.o.
! bh/gh/mh -> fa
[b h -> [%^FT] ,
g h -> [%^FT] ,
m h -> [%^FT] || _ %^bgmh %^Verb ]
.o.
[%^bgmh ->[]]
.o.

! 2nd. Conjugation Syncopation of Stem

[a i l -> %^FY l || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[a i n -> %^FY n || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[a i r -> %^FY r || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[a i s -> %^FY s || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i l -> %^FY l || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i n -> %^FY n || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i r -> %^FY r || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i s -> %^FY s || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[%^Coim ->[]]
.o.
[%^Fr ->[]]
.o.

! 1st Conjugation Slender Stems => broaden stems; leave slender for t endings

[%^LC -> %^Caol || _ %^Verb [t|.#.]]
.o.
[i -> [%^FB ] || ?+ _ ? %^LC  %^Verb]
.o.
[%^LC -> 0 ]
.o.

! 1st Conjugation Slender Stems => slenderise endings ! order is important


[a i -> %^FS i || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _ ?+]
.o.
[a í -> %^FS í || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _  ?* .#.]
.o.
[a  -> %^FS e || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _  .#.]
.o.
[á  -> %^FS e á || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _  .#.]
.o.
[a  -> %^FS e a || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _ ?+] ! f/t - to prevent  amar - eamear
.o.
[ó   -> %^FS e o || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _ ?+] 
.o.
[%^Caol -> []]
.o.

! 1st Conjugation Slender Stems => broaden root eg sábháil

[i -> [%^FB ] || _ ? %^Lea]
.o.
[%^Lea -> []]
.o.
[%^Verb -> []]

.o.

[%^VAdj -> [] ]		!TEMPORARY - VERBAL ADJS. AND VERBAL NOUNS
			!            IN 2 MUST BE SORTED OUT
;

! Verb (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! 
! (c) 2001 - NEW
! 2005 - new vn/va triggers
!***************************************************************************
!read regex
! PastInd & Imper use stem
regex [i g h -> [%^FT] || _ (%^Caol) %^igh ?* %^Verb [[\%^Fr]|.#.]] 
.o.
[%^igh ->[]]
.o.
[a i g h -> [%^FT] || _ %^aigh ?* %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[%^aigh ->[]]
.o.
!! Verbal Noun Gen
[á i l t e -> %^FT á l a || _ %^áil %^Verb ] 
.o.
[%^áil ->[]]
.o.
! Verbal Adjectives
[t h -> [%^FT] || _ %^th %^Verb ]
.o.
! th -> te 
[%^th ->[]]
.o.
! bh/gh/mh -> fa
[b h -> [%^FT] ,
g h -> [%^FT] ,
m h -> [%^FT] || _ %^bgmh %^Verb ]
.o.
[%^bgmh ->[]]
.o.

! 2nd. Conjugation Syncopation of Stem

[a i l -> %^FY l || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[a i n -> %^FY n || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[a i r -> %^FY r || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[a i s -> %^FY s || _ %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i l -> %^FY l || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i n -> %^FY n || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i r -> %^FY r || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[i s -> %^FY s || _ %^Caol %^Coim %^Verb [\%^Fr]]
.o.
[%^Coim ->[]]
.o.
[%^Fr ->[]]
.o.

! 1st Conjugation Slender Stems => broaden stems; leave slender for t endings

[%^LC -> %^Caol || _ %^Verb [t|.#.]]
.o.
[i -> [%^FB ] || ?+ _ ? %^LC  %^Verb]
.o.
[%^LC -> 0 ]
.o.

! 1st Conjugation Slender Stems => slenderise endings ! order is important


[a i -> %^FS i || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _ ?+]
.o.
[a í -> %^FS í || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _  ?* .#.]
.o.
[a  -> %^FS e || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _  .#.]
.o.
[á  -> %^FS e á || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _  .#.]
.o.
[a  -> %^FS e a || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _ ?+] ! f/t - to prevent  amar - eamear
.o.
[ó   -> %^FS e o || %^Caol %^Verb [f|t]* _ ?+] 
.o.
[%^Caol -> []]
.o.

! 1st Conjugation Slender Stems => broaden root eg sábháil

[i -> [%^FB ] || _ ? %^Lea]
.o.
[%^Lea -> []]
.o.
[%^Verb -> []]

.o.

[%^VAdj -> [] ]		!TEMPORARY - VERBAL ADJS. AND VERBAL NOUNS
			!            IN 2 MUST BE SORTED OUT
;
!***************************************************************************
!SÉIMHIÚ (LENITION)
!Noun Fem Com Sg / Noun Masc Gen Sg / Noun Voc /Noun IM / Adj / Verb
!***************************************************************************
! Séimhiú (Lenite) the following consonants: b,c,d,f,g,m,p,t
regex [..] -> %^FH h || .#. Len _  ?+ [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^M %^V]|[%^F %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
,,
[..] -> %^FH h || .#. [S|s] _  [l|n|r] VowelLC ?+ 
[[%^F %^C]
|[%^M %^G]
|[%^F %^V]
|[%^M %^V]
|[%^IM]
|[%^Adj]
|[%^Verb]
|[%^VN]] 
?* %^Sé
,,
[..] -> %^FH h || .#. [S|s] _  VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!.o.
! Séimhiú (Lenite) "s" when followed by Vowel or l|n|r
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. [s|S] _ (%^X) [VowelLC|SWord] ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. SLen _  VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. S _ VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^M %^V]|[%^F %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!!,,
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. S _ VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!.o.
!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. s _ VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!.o.
!!,,

!!.o.
! VERBS ONLY: d' before vowels & f in Past , Imperfect and Conditional of Verbs p97 no.3
! d'fhéach is split into 2 tokens: d' and fhéach EUD 2004
!![..] -> d ' || .#. _  [VowelAll|f h] ?+ %^Verb ?* %^Sé

.o.
%^Sé -> []
.o.
%^Do -> []
.o.
%^VN -> [] 	! used for séimhiú on f without d' e.g. a fheiceáil not a d'fheiceáil

!***************************************************************************
!URÚ - ECLIPSIS
!***************************************************************************
.o.
[
 b -> %^FU m b ,	! consonants
 B -> %^FU m B ,	! consonants
 c -> %^FU g c ,
 C -> %^FU g C ,
 d -> %^FU n d ,
 D -> %^FU n D ,
 f -> %^FU b h f ,
 F -> %^FU b h F ,
 g -> %^FU n g ,
 G -> %^FU n G ,
 p -> %^FU b p ,
 P -> %^FU b P ,
 T -> %^FU d T ,
 t -> %^FU d t || .#. _ ?+ [[%^G]| [[%^M | %^F] %^C]|[%^Verb]|[%^Adj]|[%^IM]] ?* %^Urú		! Gen Pl & comp prep.
]
.o. 
[..] -> %^FU n %-  || .#. (%^X) _  VowelAll ?* [[%^G]| [[%^M | %^F] %^C]|[%^Verb]|[%^IM]] ?* %^Urú		! Gen Pl only

.o.
[%^Urú -> []]


!***************************************************************************
! VOWEL PREFIXING t-, h, ts
!***************************************************************************
.o.
! t- before Vowel (lowercase) : Masc Com Sg
[..] -> %^FV t %- || .#. (%^X) _ VowelLC ?* %^M %^C ?* %^tv			
.o.
! t before Vowel (uppercase) : Masc Com Sg
[..] -> %^FV t || .#. (%^X) _ VowelUC ?* %^M %^C ?* %^tv			
.o.
[%^tv -> []]

.o.

! h before Vowel [ Fem Gen Sg | Com Pl]
! ALSO le hÁine, go hiontach
[..] -> %^FV h   || .#. (%^X) _ VowelAll ?* [[%^F %^G] | [%^C]|[%^Verb]|%^IM] ?* %^hv		
!.o.
! this inserts hPref on lower not upper side
![0 <- %+hPref || .#. %^FV _ ]
.o.
[%^hv -> []]

.o.
! t before s [ Fem Com Sg | Masc Gen]
 s -> %^FU t s || .#. _  (%^FH) [VowelAll|l|n|r|h] ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]] ?* %^ts

.o.
 S -> %^FU t S || .#. _  (%^FH) [VowelAll|l|n|r|h] ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]] ?* %^ts
.o.
 
%^FH h -> [] || .#. %^FU t [s|S] _ 
!!!h -> [] || .#. %^FU t [s|S] %^FH  _ 

.o. 

%^ts -> []


!***************************************************************************
! POSSESSIVE PREFIX 
!***************************************************************************
.o.

! the following two are now included in determiners with mo and do

![..] -> m '  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss 		! m'athair - my father; m'aithreacha
!,,
![..] -> d '  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss		! d'athair - your father
!,,

! the following are performed in parallel as we want all forms

[..] -> %^FV h  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss			! a hathair - her father
,,
[..] -> %^FV n %-  || .#. _ VowelAll ?+ %^Poss 		! n-athair - our/your/their
.o.
%^Poss -> []

.o.
%^IM -> []	! initial mutations caused by compound prepp, possessives etc.

;
compose net
